Missouri, session 2026, SB1459.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.486, to read as
follows:
1.486. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Anti-Red Flag Gun Seizure Act".
2. As used in this section, "red flag law" means:
(1) Any gun control law, order, or measure that
directs the temporary or permanent seizure of any firearm,
firearm accessory, or ammunition of an individual, except
persons lawfully in custody or persons who have been
released after the execution of a bail bond after having
been charged with a dangerous felony, as defined in section
556.061;
(2) Any federal statute, federal rule, federal
executive order, or federal judicial order or finding, or
any state statute, state rule, state executive order, or
state judicial order or finding, that:
(a) Prohibits a Missouri citizen from owning,
possessing, transporting, transferring, or receiving any
firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition, except persons

SB 1459 2
lawfully in custody or persons who have been released after
the execution of a bail bond after having been charged with
a dangerous felony, as defined in section 556.061; or
(b) Orders the removal or requires the surrender of
any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition, except
persons lawfully in custody or persons who have been
released after the execution of a bail bond after having
been charged with a dangerous felony, as defined in section
556.061.
3. Any federal order of protection, other judicial
order issued by a federal court, or federal executive order
that is a red flag law or otherwise directs the confiscation
of any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition from any
law-abiding citizen within the borders of this state shall
not be enforced in this state by any state agency, political
subdivision, or state or local law enforcement agency.
4. No state agency, political subdivision, or state or
local law enforcement agency shall receive any federal
moneys for the purpose of enforcing any federal statute,
federal rule, federal executive order, or federal judicial
order or findings, or for the purpose of enforcing any state
statute, state rule, state executive order, or state
judicial order or findings, that would have the effect of
enforcing a red flag law against a Missouri citizen.
5. No state entity or employee thereof, political
subdivision or employee thereof, or other entity or person
shall have the authority to enforce or attempt to enforce a
red flag law regardless of the red flag law's origin or the
authority of the issuing entity. This subsection shall not
apply to any agent of the federal government enforcing a
federal law or federal order.

SB 1459 3
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent a firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition from
being seized as evidence by law enforcement in the course of
an investigation.
7. (1) A political subdivision or state or local law
enforcement agency that employs a law enforcement officer
who knowingly acts to violate this section and enforce a red
flag law under the color of any state or federal statute,
rule, executive order, or judicial order or finding shall be
liable to the party against whom the red flag law was
enforced in an action at law, suit in equity, or other
proper proceeding for redress and shall be subject to a
civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars per occurrence.
(2) Any person injured under this section shall have
standing to pursue an action for injunctive relief in the
circuit court of the county in which the action allegedly
occurred or in the circuit court of Cole County.
(3) The court shall hold a hearing on any motion for a
temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction within
thirty days of service of a petition for the same.
(4) In an action brought under this section by a party
against whom the red flag law was enforced, a court may
order injunctive or other equitable relief, recovery of
damages, other legal remedies, and payment of reasonable
attorney's fees, costs, and expenses of the party. The
relief and remedies set forth in this section shall not be
deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to any other
relief or remedies permitted by law. The court may award
the prevailing party, if not the state of Missouri or a
political subdivision thereof, reasonable attorney's fees
and costs.

SB 1459 4
(5) Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
defense to any action brought under this section.
✓